Connecticut, session 2026, SB00025.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of ____ dollars be appropriated to the Department of
Education, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, for the preapprenticeship grant program established pursuant to
section 10-21p of the general statutes.